Maryland, session 2026, HB0417.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
8–6A–01.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the Maryland Substance Abuse Fund.
(b) (3) The Fund consists of [the]:
(I) THE fee required under § 6–229 of the Criminal Procedure
Article[, money];
(II) CIVIL PENALTIES COLLECTED AND REMITTED TO THE
COMPTROLLER UNDER § 21–2G–02(E) OF THIS ARTICLE;
(III) MONEY appropriated in the State budget to the Fund[, all];
(IV) ALL earnings from investment of money in the Fund[,]; and
[other]
(V) ANY OTHER money accepted for the benefit of the Fund from a
governmental or private source.
SUBTITLE 2G. MEDETOMIDINE AND XYLAZINE CONSUMER PROTECTION ACT.
21–2G–01.

HOUSE BILL 417 3
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “MEDETOMIDINE PRODUCT” MEANS A PRODUCT CONTAINING ANY
AMOUNT OF MEDETOMIDINE.
(C) (1) “RETAILER” MEANS A PERSON THAT:
(I) SELLS, PREPARES, OR MAINTAINS MEDETOMIDINE
PRODUCTS OR XYLAZINE PRODUCTS; OR
(II) ADVERTISES, REPRESENTS, OR HOLDS ITSELF OUT AS
SELLING, PREPARING, OR MAINTAINING MEDETOMIDINE PRODUCTS AND XYLAZINE
PRODUCTS.
(2) “RETAILER” INCLUDES A MANUFACTURER, A WHOLESALER, A
CORPORATION, A PARTNERSHIP, A LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY, A FIRM, AN
ONLINE PLATFORM, OR ANY OTHER BUSINESS ENTITY DOING BUSINESS WITHIN THE
STATE.
(D) “XYLAZINE PRODUCT” MEANS A PRODUCT CONTAINING ANY AMOUNT OF
XYLAZINE.
21–2G–02.
(A) A RETAILER MAY NOT DISTRIBUTE OR SELL A MEDETOMIDINE PRODUCT
OR XYLAZINE PRODUCT UNLESS THE PURCHASER PROVIDES TO THE RETAILER
PROOF OF THE PURCHASER’S INTENT TO USE THE MEDETOMIDINE PRODUCT OR
XYLAZINE PRODUCT FOR AN INSTITUTIONAL, VETERINARY, OR SCIENTIFIC
PURPOSE.
(B) A RETAILER MAY NOT DISTRIBUTE, SELL, OR EXPOSE FOR SALE A
MEDETOMIDINE PRODUCT OR A XYLAZINE PRODUCT TO AN INDIVIDUAL UNDER THE
AGE OF 21 YEARS.
(C) A RETAILER THAT PREPARES, DISTRIBUTES, SELLS, OR EXPOSES FOR
SALE A MEDETOMIDINE PRODUCT OR A XYLAZINE PRODUCT SHALL MAINTAIN
RECORDS OF ALL SALES, INCLUDING A COPY OF:
(1) THE IDENTIFICATION USED AS PROOF OF THE PURCHASER’S AGE;
AND

HOUSE BILL 417
(2) EACH DOCUMENT OR OTHER MATERIAL USED AS PROOF OF THE
PURCHASER’S INTENDED USE.
(D) A RETAILER THAT VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL
PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING:
(1) $3,000 FOR A FIRST VIOLATION; OR
(2) $6,500 FOR EACH SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REMIT ALL CIVIL PENALTIES COLLECTED
UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION TO THE COMPTROLLER TO BE DEPOSITED
IN THE MARYLAND SUBSTANCE ABUSE FUND.
21–2G–03.
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SUBTITLE.
Article – Criminal Law
5–404.
(a) Schedule III consists of:
(1) MEDETOMIDINE;
(2) XYLAZINE; AND
(3) each controlled dangerous substance by whatever official name,
common or usual name, chemical name, or brand name:
[(1)] (I) added to Schedule III by the Department under § 5–202(b) of this
title; or
[(2)] (II) designated as a Schedule III controlled dangerous substance by
the federal government unless the Department objects under § 5–202(f) of this title.
(b) The Department may not add a substance to Schedule III under § 5–202 of
this title unless the Department finds:
(1) a potential for abuse of the substance that is less than that for the
substances listed in Schedule I and Schedule II;

HOUSE BILL 417 5
(2) well documented and approved medical use of the substance in the
United States; and
(3) evidence that abuse of the substance may lead to moderate or low
physical dependence or high psychological dependence.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.